Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-437
Permit privileges.

A permit shall entitle the vehicle for which it is issued access to any permit area and no other right or privilege shall be conveyed. A permit shall not entitle the holder, or any occupant of the vehicle, to any service, facility, or activity for which a separate fee is imposed.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1104;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 147.